src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The UNDEFINED language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON Cases
+N+Sg+Nom:    #   ;
+N+Pl+Nom:NAR     #   ;
+N+Sg+Loc:    #   ;  ! to be filled in ...
+N+Pl+Loc:   #   ;   ! to be filled in ...
+N+Sg+Acc:    #   ;  ! to be filled in ...
+N+Pl+Acc:   #   ;   ! to be filled in ...
				     ! to be filled in ...
! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
