src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
!! Nouns
!  -----
!! Nouns in UNDEFINED language are things.

LEXICON Nouns
ᠠᡃᡋᡇ:A%:BV    Cases   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
